Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 70
MEDICATION CONSISTENCY FOR
INDIVIDUALS WITH BEHAVIORAL OR MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS
IN THE CRIMINAL AND JUVENILE JUSTICE SYSTEMS

Section

27-70-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The lack of medication consistency for individuals with behavioral or mental health disorders who are involved in the criminal and juvenile justice systems creates additional, often serious, problems for these individuals;

It is critical that the state increase the likelihood that a broad spectrum of effective medications, including psychotropic medications, are available to these individuals, regardless of setting or service provider;

By working cooperatively with the criminal and juvenile justice systems and mental health service providers, the state can help ensure medication consistency and also decrease overall state costs through the use of a common and agreed upon medication formulary and cooperative purchasing;

Prior to its repeal in 2018, the medication consistency work group of the behavioral health transformation council identified mental health medications that are essential and preferred for a basic medication formulary that could be used across all public systems to increase medication continuity for individuals with behavioral or mental health disorders in the criminal and juvenile justice systems; and

Increasing information sharing across systems and service providers about the importance of medication consistency and the use of a common and agreed upon medication formulary and cooperative purchasing will result in long-term benefits for the state and for individuals with behavioral or mental health disorders who are involved in the criminal and juvenile justice systems.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added, (SB 17-019), ch. 405, p. 2113, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 18-161), ch. 123, p. 831, § 5, effective September 1.

27-70-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 70, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "Facility" means a federally qualified health-care center, clinic, community mental health center or clinic, behavioral health entity, institution, acute treatment unit, jail, facility operated by the department of corrections, or a facility operated by the division of youth services.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Facility" means a federally qualified health-care center, clinic, behavioral health entity, institution, acute treatment unit, jail, facility operated by the department of corrections, or a facility operated by the division of youth services.

"Medication formulary" means the medication formulary established pursuant to section 27-70-103 for use by providers.

Repealed.

"Provider" means any person, facility, or government entity responsible for providing mental health services related to the care and treatment of an individual with behavioral or mental health disorders who is or was involved with the criminal or juvenile justice system.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added, (SB 17-019), ch. 405, p. 2114, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3644, § 19, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1) amended and (4) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1548, § 141, effective July 1; (2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1595, § 238, effective July 1, 2024.

27-70-103. Medication consistency for individuals with behavioral or mental health disorders in the criminal and juvenile justice systems - medication formulary - cooperative purchasing - reporting - rules.

Beginning December 1, 2017, the state board of human services, in consultation with the department of corrections, shall promulgate rules that require providers under the department's and the BHA's authority to use a medication formulary that has been developed collaboratively by departments, agencies, and providers. Public hospitals and licensed private hospitals may also, at their discretion, participate in the medication formulary. Using consulting services as necessary, the department and the BHA shall also develop processes for education and marketing related to information regarding the medication formulary and cooperative purchasing opportunities for facilities and providers.

For the sole purpose of ensuring medication consistency for persons with mental health disorders in the criminal and juvenile justice systems, the department of corrections, counties, the division of youth services, community mental health centers, and other providers shall share patient-specific mental health and treatment information. All such information sharing must comply with confidentiality requirements, including any necessary memorandums of understanding between providers, set forth in the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", 45 CFR parts 2, 160, 162, and 164.

Beginning July 1, 2018, the BHA shall have the following duties and responsibilities, subject to available appropriations:

On or before September 1, 2018, and every September 1 of every even-numbered year thereafter, the BHA shall conduct a review of the medication formulary to address any urgent concerns related to the formulary and to propose updates to the formulary. During this review, the BHA shall also create the appropriate notification process for updates to the formulary.

On or before July 1, 2019, and every two years thereafter as necessary, the BHA shall conduct a review of the medication formulary to update the medication formulary and ensure compliance with the medicaid formulary used by the department of health care policy and financing.

The BHA, in collaboration with the office of information technology, the office of e-health innovation, the department of health care policy and financing, the department of public safety, the department of corrections, and other agencies as appropriate, shall develop a plan by which the patient-specific information required by subsection (1)(b) of this section can be shared electronically, while still in compliance with confidentiality requirements, including any necessary memorandums of understanding between providers, set forth in the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", 45 CFR 2, 160, 162, and 164.

The BHA shall encourage providers that have been granted purchasing authority by the department of personnel pursuant to section 24-102-204 to utilize cooperative purchasing for the medication formulary, as authorized pursuant to section 24-110-201, unless the provider can obtain the medication elsewhere at a lower cost. The use of cooperative purchasing may, and is encouraged to, include external procurement activity, as defined in section 24-110-101 (2), if the external procurement activity aggregates purchasing volume to negotiate discounts with manufacturers, distributors, and other vendors.

Any external procurement activity, as defined in section 24-110-101 (2), used by providers for purposes of this article 70 is encouraged to include an ongoing drug utilization review process. The purpose of the review process is to help ensure a structured, ongoing review of health-care provider prescribing, pharmacist dispensing, and patient use of medication. The review must include a comprehensive analysis of patients' prescription and medication data to help ensure appropriate medication decision-making and positive patient outcomes by providing educational feedback to providers on appropriate medication utilization.

The BHA shall investigate and develop options for collaboration with local county jails to coordinate medication purchasing.

Beginning in January 2019, and every January thereafter, the BHA and the department of corrections shall report progress on the implementation and use of the medication formulary and cooperative purchasing as part of the BHA's and department's "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203. The department and the BHA shall make such reports to the joint health and human services committee and the joint judiciary committee, or any successor committees.

This section is exempt from the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11), and the periodic reporting requirement of that section shall remain in effect until changed by the general assembly acting by bill.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added, (SB 17-019), ch. 405, p. 2114, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(2)(e) amended, (SB 18-161), ch. 123, p. 831, § 6, effective September 1.

L. 2022:

(1)(a), IP(2), (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d)(I), (2)(e), and (3)(a) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1548, § 142, effective July 1.